California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8438.

Notwithstanding Section 200, the commission shall regulate the taking of freshwater clams for commercial purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8475 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 160.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Fresh-water Fish for Bait [8460. - 8463.]

8460.

Any person engaged for profit in the taking, transporting, or selling of live fresh-water fish for bait shall first obtain from the department a live fresh-water bait fish license to possess the fish for those purposes. The commission may prescribe regulations governing these licenses.

A license shall be issued for a calendar year, or, if issued after the beginning of such term, for the remainder thereof, and may be revoked for a violation of the terms thereof.

Such a license is not required for the raising, possession, or sale of live fresh-water fish for bait under authority of Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

The provisions of this code on commercial fishing, packing, or processing licenses, on reports by persons engaged in the commercial fish industry, and on statements required by owners or operators of fishing boats, do not apply to the taking, transporting, or selling of live fresh-water fish for bait.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

8461.

The annual license fee for a live freshwater bait fish license is fifty-five dollars ($55) for each person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 701, Sec. 33.   Effective September 15, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 72 of Ch. 701.)
-------------------------------------------

8462.

A license issued under Section 8460 shall authorize the taking of only golden shiners, fathead minnows and such other species as the department may designate, under such regulations as the commission may prescribe. The commission may prohibit in any part or all parts of the State the possession alive of any species of fish which it considers a potential threat to the fisheries of the State by reason of possible escape and establishment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8463.

Traps not over 24 inches in greatest length nor more than 12 inches in greatest depth or width, or seines of not over 12-inch mesh stretched measure and not more than 4 x 30 feet in size, may be used for the taking of fish of the carp and minnow family (family Cyprinidae), suckers (family Catostomidae), sculpins (family Cottidae), or mosquito fish (genus Gambusia). Such traps may be used only in lakes and impounded waters. Such seines may be used only in lakes, impounded waters, and conduits.

Fish taken as provided in this section may be sold only as bait. Fish other than those named in this section that may be taken in such traps or seines shall be released and returned unharmed to the water wherein taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Crayfish [8490. - 8492.]

8490.

The taking of crayfish shall be subject to regulations as prescribed by the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8491 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   (AB 165)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8491.

(a) Any allowance for the commercial taking of crayfish in Lake Tahoe or in the Lake Tahoe Basin shall be for the primary purpose of population reduction and control of the signal crayfish, an invasive species. The commercial taking of crayfish may be allowed only to the extent that it is consistent with state goals for management of invasive species and other environmental standards, including an environmental analysis conducted by the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency or another appropriate lead agency for each proposed individual harvest operation.

(b) The commission
 shall ensure that, with respect to the taking of crayfish for commercial purposes in Lake Tahoe or in the Lake Tahoe Basin, the commission’s regulations are consistent with the Lake Tahoe Region Aquatic Invasive Species Management Plan, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 226, Sec. 3.   (AB 165)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8492.

The department shall take the steps it determines are necessary to prevent overfishing of crayfish in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta. Those steps may include, but are not limited to, submitting to the Legislature proposed legislation to place limitations on the commercial crayfishing in that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 528, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Halibut Trawl Grounds [8494. - 8497.]

8494.

(a) Any vessel using bottom trawl gear in state-managed halibut fisheries, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 8841, shall possess a valid California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit that has not been suspended or revoked and that is issued by the department authorizing the use of trawl gear by that vessel for the take of California halibut.

(b) A California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit shall be issued annually, and commencing with the 2006 permit year, shall be issued only to a person who had been issued a California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit in the immediately preceding permit year.

(c) Permits issued pursuant to this section may be transferred only if at least one of the
 following occur:

(1) The commission adopts a restricted access program for the fishery that is consistent with the commission’s policies regarding restricted access to commercial fisheries.

(2) (A) Before the implementation of a halibut trawl restricted access program, the department may consider requests from a vessel permitholder or the permitholder’s conservator or estate representative, as applicable, to transfer a vessel permit to a vessel consistent with the requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C). The department may request information that it determines is reasonably necessary from the permitholder or the permitholder’s conservator or heirs or estate for the purpose of verifying statements in the request before authorizing the transfer of the permit.

(B) The department may approve the
 transfer of a California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit to a replacement vessel if all of the following requirements are met:

(i) In the form of a notarized application, the permitholder submits to the department a request for the transfer of a California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit to another vessel owned by the permitholder.

(ii) The permitholder provides a current United States Coast Guard certificate of documentation or vessel marine survey to the department for the permitted vessel and replacement vessel.

(iii) Based on the information provided pursuant to clause (ii), the department determines that the replacement vessel is equal to or less than the capacity of the permitted vessel.

(iv) The department determines the California halibut
 bottom trawl vessel permit for the permitted vessel is valid and has not been suspended or revoked.

(v) If applicable, the department receives written confirmation from the replacement vessel’s owner or authorized agent, or mortgager, of the vessel’s participation in the transfer of the California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit.

(vi) The replacement vessel is registered with the department pursuant to Section 7881 at the time the application is submitted pursuant to clause (i).

(C) The department may approve the transfer of a California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit to another person if all of the following requirements are met:

(i) In the form of a notarized application, the permitholder or the permitholder’s conservator or estate submits to
 the department a request to transfer a California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit to another person.

(ii) If the permitholder’s estate submits a request pursuant to clause (i), the estate submits the notarized application to the department within one year of the death of the permitholder as listed on the death certificate.

(iii) A current United States Coast Guard certificate of documentation or vessel marine survey is provided to the department for the permitted vessel and vessel to be used by the proposed transferee.

(iv) Based on the information provided pursuant to clause (iii), the department determines that the vessel to be used by the proposed transferee is equal to or less than the capacity of the permitted vessel.

(v) The proposed transferee
 meets both of the following requirements:

(I) The person has a valid commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7852 that has not been suspended or revoked.

(II) The person is the owner of a commercial fishing vessel that is registered with the department pursuant to Section 7881 and that registration has not been suspended or revoked.

(vi) The permit for the permitted vessel is current, and the permitholder or the permitholder’s conservator or estate submitting the application is responsible for any renewal of the permit that becomes due during the application processing period.

(vii) Under penalty of perjury, the permitholder or the permitholder’s conservator or estate signs the application for transfer and certifies that the information
 included is true to the best of the permitholder’s information and belief.

(D) Any applicant who is denied transfer pursuant to this paragraph may appeal the denial in writing describing the basis for the appeal to the commission within 60 days from the date of the department’s decision.

(d) The commission shall establish California halibut bottom trawl vessel permit fees based on the recommendations of the department and utilizing the guidelines outlined in subdivision (b) of Section 711 to cover the costs of administering this section. Before the adoption of a restricted access program pursuant to subdivision (c), fees may not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per permit.

(e) Individuals holding a federal groundfish trawl permit may retain and land up to 150 pounds of California halibut per trip without a
 California halibut trawl permit in accordance with federal and state regulations, including, but not limited to, regulations developed under a halibut fishery management plan.

(f) This section shall become inoperative upon the adoption by the commission of a halibut fishery management plan in accordance with the requirements of Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050).

(g) The commission may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 161.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative on date prescribed in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

8495.

(a) The following areas are designated as the California halibut trawl grounds:

(1) The ocean waters lying between one and three nautical miles from the mainland shore lying south and east of a line running due west (270° true) from Point Arguello and north and west of a line running due south (180° true) from Point Mugu.

(2) The ocean waters of Monterey Bay delineated by straight lines connecting the following points in the following order and excluding federal waters as defined by the order entered by the United States Supreme Court in the case of United States of America v.
 State of California, 135 S.Ct. 563 (2014):LatitudeLongitude36° 54.146′ N122° 4.244′ W36° 52.910′ N122°
 4.225′ W36° 52.024′ N122° 2.117′ W36° 51.680′ N121° 59.321′ W36° 52.230′ N121° 57.810′ W36° 48.974′ N121° 52.474′ W36° 49.835′ N121° 51.840′ W36° 54.250′ N121° 54.883′
 W36° 54.287′ N121° 58.062′ W36° 53.956′ N122° 2.117′ WLongitudeLatitude-121° 52.00320096′36° 49.732266378′-121° 52.44333966′36° 48.980946096′-121° 57.77850834′36° 52.23946824′-121° 59.32425072′36° 51.680657442′-122° 2.12078646′36° 52.009891824′-122° 4.18901964′36° 52.816435086′-122° 4.51162806′36° 53.907575316′(3) The ocean waters
 offshore of Port San Luis lying between one and three nautical miles from the mainland shore, as described by an area circumscribed by a line connecting the following points in clockwise order, with the line connecting the last two points approximately parallel to the lines connecting the preceding points:LatitudeLongitude35° 08′ N120° 46′ W35° 08′ N120° 40.1′ W35° 06.6′ N120° 39.2′ W35° 02.2′ N120° 39.3′ W34° 57′ N120° 40.7′ W34° 57′ N120° 43.5′ W35° 06.4′ N120° 46′ WLongitudeLatitude-121° 52.00320096′36° 49.732266378′-121° 52.44333966′36° 48.980946096′-121° 57.77850834′36° 52.23946824′-121° 59.32425072′36° 51.680657442′-122° 2.12078646′36° 52.009891824′-122° 4.18901964′36° 52.816435086′-122° 4.51162806′36° 53.907575316′(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the use of trawl gear for the take of fish is
 prohibited in the following areas of the California halibut trawl grounds:

(1) Around Point Arguello. The area from a line extending from Point Arguello true west (270°) and out three miles, to a line extending from Rocky Point true south (180°) and out three miles.

(2) Around Point Conception. From a point on land approximately one-half mile north of Point Conception at latitude 34° 27.5´ extending seaward true west (270°) from one to three miles, to a point on land approximately one-half mile east of Point Conception at longitude 120° 27.5´ extending seaward true south (180°) from one to three miles.

(3) In the Hueneme Canyon in that portion demarked by the IMO Vessel Traffic safety zone on NOAA/NOS Chart 18725 and from
 one mile to the three mile limit of state waters.

(4) In Mugu Canyon, from Laguna Point, a line extending true south (180°) and out three miles, to Point Mugu, a line extending true south (180°) and from one to three miles.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing April 1, 2008, the following areas in the California halibut trawl grounds shall be closed to trawling, unless the commission finds that a bottom trawl fishery for halibut minimizes bycatch, is likely not damaging sea floor habitat, is not adversely affecting ecosystem health, and is not impeding reasonable restoration of kelp, coral, or other biogenic habitats:

(A) The ocean waters lying between one and three nautical miles from the
 mainland shore from a point east of a line extending seaward true south (180°) from a point on land approximately one-half mile east of Point Conception at longitude 120° 27.5´ to a line extending due south from Gaviota.

(B) The ocean waters lying between one and two nautical miles from the mainland shore lying east of a line extending due south from Santa Barbara Point (180°) and west of a line extending due south from Pitas Point (180°).

(C) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the ocean waters lying between one and three nautical miles from the mainland shore lying south and east of a line running due west (270° true) from Point Arguello to a line extending seaward true south (180°) from a point on land approximately
 12 mile east of Point Conception at longitude 120° 27.5´, and from the western border of the IMO Vessel Traffic safety zone on NOAA/NOS Chart 18725 in Hueneme Canyon running south and east to a line running due south (180° true) from Point Mugu.

(2) In making the finding described in paragraph (1), the commission shall pay special attention to areas where kelp and other biogenic habitats existed and where restoring those habitats is reasonably feasible, and to hard bottom areas and other substrate that may be particularly sensitive to bottom trawl impacts.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the areas of the halibut trawl grounds identified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a)
 shall remain closed to trawling until the commission determines that trawling in those areas is consistent with the provisions of this section. At the commission’s discretion, a determination pursuant to this subdivision may be made through the review required pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) Commencing January 1, 2008, the commission shall review information every three years from the federal groundfish observer program and other available research and monitoring information it determines relevant, and shall close any areas in the California halibut trawl grounds where it finds that the use of trawl gear does not minimize bycatch, is likely damaging sea floor habitat, is adversely affecting ecosystem health, or impedes reasonable restoration of kelp, coral, or other biogenic habitats. The commission shall pay special attention to areas where kelp
 and other biogenic habitats existed and where restoring those habitats is reasonably feasible, and to hard bottom areas and other substrate that may be particularly sensitive to bottom trawl impacts in making that finding.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall determine the size, weight, and configuration of all parts of the trawl gear, including, but not limited to, net, mesh, doors, appurtenances, and towing equipment as it determines is necessary to ensure trawl gear is used in a sustainable manner within the California halibut trawl grounds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 985, Sec. 8.   (SB 1309)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8496.

(a) Unless otherwise specified by the commission pursuant subdivision (b), within the California halibut trawl grounds the following requirements shall apply to the use of trawl nets:

(1) Open season and hours of operation shall be as
 follows:

(A) Open season shall be June 16 to March 14, inclusive.

(B) In the designated halibut trawl grounds within Monterey Bay and offshore of Port San Luis, trawl fishing gear may only be deployed to capture fish between sunrise and sunset.

(2) California halibut shall only be taken pursuant to Section 8392.

(3) Not more than 500 pounds of fish other than California halibut may be possessed, except that any amount of sea cucumbers may be possessed by a person who holds a valid sea cucumber permit and who meets any conditions adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 8405.3, and any amount of sharks, skates, or rays for which the take or possession of that species is
 not otherwise prohibited by this code may be taken or possessed.

(4) It is unlawful to operate a trawl net in a way that damages or destroys other types of fishing gear that is buoyed or otherwise visibly marked.

(5) Sections 8833 and 8836 do not apply to trawl nets when used or
 possessed on California halibut trawl grounds.

(6) Trawl nets described in Section 8843 shall only be used within the halibut trawl grounds.

(7) Single bags and cod-ends or double bags and cod-ends may be used within the halibut trawl grounds and may be possessed while a vessel is in
 transit directly to the halibut trawl grounds or returning directly to port. Double bags shall be hung and tied to each rib line so that the knots of each layer coincide, knot for knot,
 for the full length of the double layers. The double mesh section shall not measure over 25 meshes or 12 feet in length, whichever is greater. The individual meshes in the double section shall measure not less than seven and one-half inches in length.

(8) No net, whose cod-end meshes are less than prescribed in this section, may be possessed on any vessel that is operating under the authority of this section.

(b) The commission may reduce the length of
 the open season or hours of operation, or either of those, specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The commission may also modify any of the requirements of paragraphs (2) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (a) to make those requirements more restrictive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 985, Sec. 9.   (SB 1309)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8497.

If the director determines that the California halibut resource, or existing fishing operations, within the designated California halibut trawl grounds are in danger of irreparable injury, he or she may order the closure of the area, or portions thereof, to trawl net fishing or further restrict the nets that may be used in the area, or portions thereof. Any such closure or restriction order shall be adopted by emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

The department shall bring to the attention of the Legislature within 30 calendar days after commencement of the next succeeding regular session of the Legislature any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Tidal Invertebrates [8500. - 8500.]

8500.

Except as otherwise expressly permitted in this chapter, no mollusks, crustaceans, or other invertebrates may be taken, possessed aboard a boat, or landed for commercial purposes by any person in any tide pool or tidal area, including tide flats or other areas between the high tidemark and 1,000 feet beyond the low tidemark, unless a valid tidal invertebrate permit has been issued to that person that has not been suspended or revoked. The taking, possessing, or landing of mollusks, crustaceans, or other invertebrates pursuant to this section shall be subject to regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. Krill [8510. - 8510.]

8510.

It is unlawful to take or land krill of any species of euphausiid for any purpose except scientific research pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission. This section applies to krill in the waters of this state and up to 200 miles offshore, as long as federal law does not regulate the taking of krill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Herring [8550. - 8559.]

8550.

Herring may be taken for commercial purposes only under a permit, subject to regulations adopted by the commission. The commission may, whenever necessary to prevent overutilization, to ensure efficient and economic operation of the fishery, or to otherwise carry out this article, limit the total number of permits that are issued and the amount of herring that may be taken under the permits.

The commission, in limiting the total number of permits, shall take into consideration any restriction of the fishing area and the safety of others who, for purposes other than fishing, use the waters from which herring are taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8550.5.

(a) A herring net permit granting the privilege to take herring with nets for commercial purposes shall be issued to licensed commercial fishermen, subject to regulations adopted under Section 8550, as follows:

(1) To any resident of this state to use gill nets, upon payment of a fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265).

(2) To any nonresident to use gill nets, upon payment of a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) The commission shall not require a permit for a person to be a crewmember on a vessel taking herring pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.

(a) It is unlawful to take herring for roe on a vessel unless the operator holds a herring permit issued by the department pursuant to commission regulations. The permit may be transferred pursuant to Sections 8552.2 and 8552.6.

(b) No person may be issued more than one herring permit, and the department shall not issue a herring permit to more than one person except as provided in Section 8552.6.

(c) Herring permits shall only be issued to and shall be held only by a natural person.

(d) Herring permits shall not be used as any form of security for any purpose, including, but not limited to, financial or performance obligations.

(e) The permittee shall be on board the vessel at all times during herring fishing operations, subject only to exceptions provided for in this code and regulations adopted under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1505, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.1.

The commission, in consultation with the department and representatives of the commercial roe herring fishery, and after holding at least one public hearing, may adjust the fees charged for permits; including fees for the issuance or transfer of permits, to a level that will not discourage the transfer of permits or limit entry into the fishery, and that will ensure sufficient funds to cover reasonable department costs associated with the management of the fishery, including research and enforcement costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 713, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.2.

Notwithstanding Section 1052, a herring permit may be transferred from a herring permitholder to a nonpermitholder having a minimum of 20 or more herring fishery points, as follows: The permitholder shall mail, by certified or registered mail, to the department and every individual listed on the department’s list of maximum 20 or more point herring fishery participants, his or her notice of intention to transfer his or her herring permit, which notice shall specify the gear type to be used under the herring permit; the name, address, and telephone number of the transferor and proposed transferee; and the amount of consideration, if any, sought by the transferor. Sixty days after mailing the notice, the transferor may transfer the permit to any person having 20 or more experience points without the necessity for giving further notice if the transfer occurs within six months of the date the original notice was given. Transfers after that six-month period shall require another 60-day notice of intention to be given. No person may hold more than one herring permit. A true copy of the notice of intention to transfer a permit shall be filed with the department by the transferor under penalty of perjury and shall be available for public review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 207, Sec. 4.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.3.

The commission may, in consultation with representatives of the commercial herring roe fishery, and after holding at least one public hearing, adopt regulations intended to facilitate the transfer of herring permits, including, but not limited to, regulations that would do the following:

(a) Allow an individual to own a single permit for each of the different herring gillnet platoons in San Francisco Bay.

(b) Eliminate the point system for qualifying for a herring permit.

(c) Allow a herring permit to be passed from a parent to child, or between
 spouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 42.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.4.

Herring permits that are revoked or not renewed may be offered by the department for a drawing to persons having 20 or more experience points in the fishery on the first Friday of August of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 207, Sec. 5.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.5.

The commission shall revoke any herring permit if the holder of the herring permit was convicted of failing to report herring landings or underreported herring landings or failed to correctly file with the department the offer or the acceptance for a permit transferred pursuant to Section 8552.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1505, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8552, a herring permit may be issued to two individuals if one of the following criteria is met:

(1) The individuals are married to each other and file with the department a certified copy of their certificate of marriage and a declaration under penalty of perjury, or a court order, stating that the permit is community property.

(2) The individuals meet both of the following requirements:

(A) They are both engaged in the herring roe fishery either by fishing aboard the vessel or by personally participating in the management, administration, and operation of the partnership’s herring fishing business.

(B) There is a partnership constituting equal, 50 percent, ownership in a herring fishery operation, including a vessel or equipment, and that partnership is demonstrated by any two of the following:

(i) A copy of a federal partnership tax return.

(ii) A written partnership agreement.

(iii) Joint ownership of a fishing vessel used in the herring fishery as demonstrated on federal vessel license documents.

(b) For purposes of this section, a herring permit does not constitute a herring fishing operation. A herring permit may be transferred to one of the partners to be held thereafter in that partner’s name only if that partner has not less than 10 points computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 8552.8 and there has been a death or retirement of the other partner, a dissolution of partnership, or the partnership is dissolved by a dissolution of marriage or decree of legal separation. A transfer under this section shall be authorized only if proof that the partnership has existed for three or more consecutive years is furnished to the department or a certified copy of a certificate of marriage is on file with the department and the permit is community property as provided in subdivision (a). The transferor of a permit shall not, by reason of the transfer, become ineligible to participate further in the herring fishery or to purchase another permit.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), in the event of the death of one of the partners holding a herring permit pursuant to this section, where the partnership existed for longer than six months but less than three years and the surviving partner does not have the minimum points pursuant to subdivision (b) to qualify for a permit transfer, the permit may be transferred on an interim basis for a period of not more than 10 years to the surviving partner if an application is submitted to the department within one year of the deceased partner’s death and the surviving partner participates in the fishery for the purpose of achieving the minimum number of points to be eligible for a permit transfer pursuant to Section 8552.2. The interim permit shall enable the surviving partner to participate in the herring fishery. At the end of the interim permit period, the surviving partner, upon application to the department, may be issued the permit if he or she has participated in the fishery and gained the minimum number of experience points for a permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 753, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.65.

(a) Upon the death of a herring permittee, the permit shall vest in the permittee’s estate or in the surviving community estate, and may be transferred by the executor, administrator, personal representative, or surviving spouse to a qualified pointholder pursuant to Section 8552.2 or to a qualified partner, pursuant to Section 8552.6.

(b) The transfer shall be initiated by notice to the department, in writing, sent by certified mail, within one year of the date of death.

(c) If no transfer is initiated within one year of the date of death, the permit shall revert to the department for disposition pursuant to Section 8552.4, and thereafter be treated as a
 herring permit that has not been renewed.

(d) The department may, upon written application, grant an extension of time up to one additional year for the transfer to be initiated.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8104 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 150.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.7.

The department shall reissue a herring permit which has been transferred pursuant to Section 8552.2 or 8552.6 upon payment of a transfer fee by the transferee of the permit. Before April 1, 1997, the transfer fee is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and, on and after April 1, 1997, the transfer fee is five thousand dollars ($5,000). The fees shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and shall be expended for research and management activities to maintain and enhance herring resources pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.8.

(a) For purposes of this article, the experience points for a person engaged in the herring roe fishery shall be based on the number of years holding a commercial fishing license and the number of years having served as a crewmember in the herring roe fishery, and determined by the sum of both of the following:

(1) One point for each year in the previous 12 years (prior to the current license year) that the person has held a commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7852, not to exceed a maximum of 10 points.

(2) Five points for one year of service as a paid crewmember in the herring roe fishery, as determined pursuant to Section 8559, three points for a second year of service as a paid crewmember, and two points for a third year as a paid crewmember, beginning with the 1978–79 herring fishing season, not to exceed a maximum of 10 points.

(b) The department shall maintain a list of all individuals possessing the maximum of 20 experience points and of all those persons holding two points or more, grouped in a list by number of points. The list shall be maintained annually and shall be available from the department to all pointholders and to all herring permittees. All pointholders are responsible for providing the department with their current address and for verifying points credited to them by the department.

(c) A herring permittee may use the department’s list and rely upon that list in making offers for transfer of his or her permit until the date of the annual distribution of the new list. On and after the date of the annual revision of the list, the permittee shall use the new list.

(d) The point provisions in this section are for purposes of sale of a permit or transfer to a partner of a coowned permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8553.

The commission may make and enforce such regulations as may be necessary or convenient for carrying out any power, authority, or jurisdiction conferred under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

8554.

The commission, in adopting regulations for the commercial herring fishery, shall provide for the temporary substitution of a permittee to take herring, if the permittee is ill or injured, by a crewmember aboard the vessel operated by the permittee. The commission may require that proof of the illness or injury be substantiated to the satisfaction of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8555.

The director shall periodically meet and confer with representatives of the commercial herring roe fishery to review regulations and policies of the commission and the department concerning that fishery and to receive recommendations on the regulation and management of that fishery. In particular, those representatives and their legal counsel may recommend to the department, for recommendation to the commission for adoption by the commission as regulations, requirements for the payment of civil damages that may be imposed in lieu of revoking or suspending a permit issued pursuant to this article or for violations of regulations adopted by the commission pertaining to the herring roe fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 725, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8556.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall determine, by regulation, if drift or set gill nets may be used to take herring for commercial purposes. The commission may also determine, by regulation, the size of the meshes of the material used to make such gill nets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 882.)
-------------------------------------------

8557.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall determine if round haul nets may be used to take herring in Districts 12 and 13 and the conditions under which those nets may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 269, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

8559.

The commission, in determining experience requirements for new entrants into the herring fishery after January 1, 1987, shall require that any person seeking a permit to operate a vessel to take herring and claiming crew experience shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department, proof of payment as a crewmember in the herring fishery based on tax records or copies of canceled checks offered and accepted as payment for service on a crew in the California herring roe fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 725, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Drift Gill Net Shark and Swordfish Fishery [8561. - 8583.5.]

8561.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8394, shark and swordfish shall not be taken for commercial purposes with drift gill nets except under a valid drift gill net shark and swordfish permit issued to that person that has not been suspended or revoked and is issued to at least one person aboard the boat.

(b) A drift gill net shark and swordfish permit shall not be required for the taking of sharks with drift gill nets with a mesh size smaller than eight inches in stretched mesh and twine size no. 18 or the equivalent of this twine size or smaller.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 8102 or any other law, a permit issued pursuant to this section shall be surrendered or revoked as
 of January 31 of the fourth year following the department’s notification to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8583.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 844, Sec. 3.   (SB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8561.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8102 or any other law, a permit issued pursuant to Section 8561 may not be transferred.

(b) This section shall become operative on March 31, 2019.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 844, Sec. 5.   (SB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative March 31, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8562.

Applications delivered to a department office after April 30, or if mailed, postmarked after April 30, shall not be accepted unless approved by the commission pursuant to Section 8569.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 525, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8563.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the permittee shall be aboard the vessel and shall be in possession of a valid drift gill net shark and swordfish permit when engaged in operations authorized by the permit.
